Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202685-2621
Tuition waiver; reimbursement to university.

(1) Beginning July 1, 2028, subject to available appropriations, the Coordinating Commission for Postsecondary Education shall reimburse each state university for fifty percent of the tuition waivers for correctional officers, youth detention officers, eligible disabled persons that were formerly correctional officers and youth detention officers, and the qualifying children of such officers and persons granted in the preceding year by such state university.

(2) A state university shall request reimbursement by submitting documentation in a form and manner prescribed by the commission.

(3) If state appropriations are not sufficient to satisfy all of the claims filed during any year, then the commission shall prorate each state university's total reimbursement for that year in proportion to the remaining appropriation. Any reimbursement claims paid on a prorated basis shall not be refiled.

Laws 2025, LB608, § 14.